Nebraska, session 109, LB349.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB349 LB349
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 70-1001.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
70-1001.01 For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1028.02, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Board means the Nebraska Power Review Board;
(2) Commercial electric vehicle charging station means equipment
designed to provide electricity for a fee for the charging of an electric
vehicle or a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, including an electric
vehicle direct-current charger or a super-fast charger, any successor
technology, and all components thereof. Commercial electric vehicle
charging station does not include the residence of a person where an
electric vehicle or a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle is charged if no
customer usage fee is charged;
(3) Commercial electric vehicle charging station operator means a
person, partnership, corporation, or other business entity or political
subdivision that operates a commercial electric vehicle charging station;
(4) Direct-current, fast-charging station means a publicly available
charging system capable of delivering at least fifty kilowatts of direct-
current electrical power to an electric vehicle's rechargeable battery at
a voltage of two hundred volts or greater;
(5) Direct-current, fast-charging station operator means a person,
partnership, corporation, or other business entity that operates a
direct-current, fast-charging station open to the public. The term does
not include an electric supplier or a political subdivision;
(6)(a) Electric energy storage resource means a resource capable of
receiving electric energy from the electrical grid, or from a generation
source with which it is associated, and storing it for later injection of
electric energy into the electrical grid; and
(b) Electric energy storage resource does not include devices or
equipment intended solely to inject or absorb reactive power, such as
capacitors and synchronous condensers, or equipment intended solely to
-2-

LB349 LB349
2025 2025
provide power for electric vehicles;
(7) (6) Electric supplier or supplier of electricity means any legal
entity, public or private, supplying, producing, storing, or distributing
electricity within the state for sale at wholesale or retail. Electric
supplier does not include a commercial electric vehicle charging station
operator that is a private person or privately owned partnership,
privately owned corporation, or other privately owned business;
(8) (7) Military installation means a military base other than a
National Guard base where fixed-wing aircraft or strategic weapon assets
are on a permanent or temporary basis assigned, stored, operated from, or
otherwise located;
(9) (8) Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle has the same meaning as in
section 60-345.01;
(10) (9) Private electric supplier means an electric supplier
producing electricity from a privately developed renewable energy
generation facility that is not a public power district, a public power
and irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership
association, any other governmental entity, or any combination thereof. A
private electric supplier is limited to the development of those
facilities as provided in subdivision (11) (10) of this section;
(11) (10) Privately developed renewable energy generation facility
means and is limited to a facility that (a) is an electric energy storage
resource or generates electricity using solar, wind, geothermal, biomass,
landfill gas, or biogas, including all electrically connected equipment
and electric energy storage resources used to produce, collect, and store
the facility output up to and including the transformer that steps up the
voltage to sixty thousand volts or greater, and including supporting
structures, buildings, and roads, unless otherwise agreed to in a joint
transmission development agreement, (b) is developed, constructed, and
owned, in whole or in part, by one or more private electric suppliers,
-3-

LB349 LB349
2025 2025
and (c) is not wholly owned by a public power district, a public power
and irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership
association, any other governmental entity, or any combination thereof;
(12) (11) Regional transmission organization means an entity
independent from those entities generating or marketing electricity at
wholesale or retail, which has operational control over the electric
transmission lines in a designated geographic area in order to reduce
constraints in the flow of electricity and ensure that all power
suppliers have open access to transmission lines for the transmission of
electricity;
(13) (12) Reliable or reliability means the ability of an electric
supplier to supply the aggregate electric power and energy requirements
of its electricity consumers in Nebraska at all times under normal
operating conditions, taking into account scheduled and unscheduled
outages, including sudden disturbances or unanticipated loss of system
components that are to be reasonably expected for any electric utility
following prudent utility practices, recognizing certain weather
conditions and other contingencies may cause outages at the distribution,
transmission, and generation level;
(14) (13) Representative organization means an organization
designated by the board and organized for the purpose of providing joint
planning and encouraging maximum cooperation and coordination among
electric suppliers. Such organization shall represent electric suppliers
owning a combined electric generation plant accredited capacity of at
least ninety percent of the total electric generation plant accredited
capacity constructed and in operation within the state;
(15) (14) State means the State of Nebraska; and
(16) (15) Unbundled retail rates means the separation of utility
bills into the individual price components for which an electric supplier
charges its retail customers, including, but not limited to, the separate
-4-

LB349 LB349
2025 2025
charges for the generation, transmission, and distribution of
electricity.
Sec. 2. Section 70-1012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
70-1012 (1) Before any electric generation facilities, any electric
energy storage resources, or any transmission lines or related facilities
carrying more than seven hundred volts are constructed or acquired by any
supplier, an application, filed with the board and containing such
information as the board shall prescribe, shall be approved by the board,
except that such approval shall not be required (a) for the construction
or acquisition of a transmission line extension or related facilities
within a supplier's own service area or for the construction or
acquisition of a line not exceeding one-half mile outside its own service
area when all owners of electric lines located within one-half mile of
the extension consent thereto in writing and such consents are filed with
the board, (b) for any generation facility when the board finds that (i)
such facility is being constructed or acquired to replace a generating
plant owned by an individual municipality or registered group of
municipalities with a capacity not greater than that of the plant being
replaced, (ii) such facility will generate less than twenty-five thousand
kilowatts of electric energy at rated capacity, and (iii) the applicant
will not use the plant or transmission capacity to supply wholesale power
to customers outside the applicant's existing retail service area or
chartered territory, (c) for acquisition of transmission lines or related
facilities, within the state, carrying one hundred fifteen thousand volts
or less, if the current owner of the transmission lines or related
facilities notifies the board of the lines or facilities involved in the
transaction and the parties to the transaction, or (d) for the
construction of a qualified facility as defined in section 70-2002.
(2)(a) Before any electric supplier commences construction of or
acquires an electric generation facility or electric energy storage
-5-

LB349 LB349
2025 2025
resource or transmission lines or related facilities carrying more than
seven hundred volts that will be located within a ten-mile radius of a
military installation, the owner of such proposed facility, resource,
transmission lines, or related facilities shall provide written notice
certifying to the board that such facility, resource, or facilities
contain no materials, electronics, or other components manufactured by
any foreign government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be a
foreign adversary pursuant to 15 C.F.R. 7.4.
(b) Any electric supplier supplying, producing, storing, or
distributing electricity within the state for sale at retail is exempt
from subdivision (a) of this subsection if it is in compliance with the
critical infrastructure protection requirements issued by the North
American Electric Reliability Corporation. To receive such exemption, the
electric supplier shall submit written notice to the board certifying
that it is in such compliance. The electric supplier shall also submit
written notice to the board at any time such supplier is no longer in
such compliance.
(3) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
Sec. 3. Section 70-1012.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
70-1012.01 (1) If a supplier terminates construction or acquisition
of electric generation or transmission facilities or electric energy
storage resources after receiving approval for the facilities or
resources from the board, the supplier shall file with the board, within
thirty days after the action taken to terminate construction or
acquisition, a statement of the factors or reasons relied upon by the
supplier in taking such action. Within ten days after receipt of such a
filing, the board shall give notice of the filing to such other suppliers
as it deems interested or affected by such action and it shall hold a
hearing for the purpose of obtaining such additional information as the
-6-

LB349 LB349
2025 2025
board deems advisable or necessary to inform other suppliers and the
public of the reasons for such termination. Notice of any such hearing
shall be given to those suppliers previously given notice of the filing
and to any other parties expressing interest in the approved application.
(2) The board shall not have authority to approve or deny the action
of a supplier terminating construction or acquisition, and any such
filing or hearing shall be advisory and solely for the purpose of
informing the board, other suppliers, interested parties, and the
ratepayers of this state of the factors or reasons relied upon in taking
action to terminate construction or acquisition.
(3) Nothing in this section shall constitute or be construed as a
defense to any cause of action, including a claim for breach of contract,
resulting from such termination.
(4) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
Sec. 4. Section 70-1015, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
70-1015 (1) If any supplier violates Chapter 70, article 10, by
either (a) commencing the construction or finalizing or attempting to
finalize the acquisition of any generation facilities, any electric
energy storage resources, any transmission lines, or any related
facilities without first providing notice or obtaining board approval,
whichever is required, or (b) serving or attempting to serve at retail
any customers located in Nebraska or any wholesale customers in violation
of section 70-1002.02, such construction, acquisition, or service of such
customers shall be enjoined in an action brought in the name of the State
of Nebraska until such supplier has complied with Chapter 70, article 10.
(2) If the executive director of the board determines that a private
electric supplier commenced construction of a privately developed
renewable energy generation facility less than thirty days prior to
providing the notice required in subdivision (2)(a) of section
-7-

LB349 LB349
2025 2025
70-1014.02, the executive director shall send notice via certified mail
to the private electric supplier, informing it of the determination that
the private electric supplier is in violation of such subdivision and is
subject to a fine in the amount of five hundred dollars. The private
electric supplier shall have twenty days from the date on which the
notice is received in which to submit the notice described in such
subdivision and to pay the fine. Within ten days after the private
electric supplier submits a notice compliant with subsection (2) of
section 70-1014.02 and payment of the fine, the executive director of the
board shall issue the written acknowledgment described in subsection (3)
of section 70-1014.02. If the private electric supplier fails to submit a
notice compliant with subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02 and pay the
fine within twenty days after the date on which the private electric
supplier receives the notice from the executive director of the board,
the private electric supplier shall immediately cease construction or
operation of the privately developed renewable energy generation
facility.
(3) If the private electric supplier disputes that construction was
commenced less than thirty days prior to submitting the written notice
required by subdivision (2)(a) of section 70-1014.02, the private
electric supplier may request a hearing before the board. Such request
shall be submitted within twenty days after the private electric supplier
receives the notice sent by the executive director pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section. If the private electric supplier does not accept the
certified mail sent pursuant to such subsection, the executive director
shall send a second notice to the private electric supplier by first-
class United States mail. The private electric supplier may submit a
request for hearing within twenty days after the date on which the second
notice was mailed.
(4) Upon receipt of a request for hearing, the board shall set a
hearing date. Such hearing shall be held within sixty days after such
-8-

LB349 LB349
2025 2025
receipt. The board shall provide to the private electric supplier written
notice of the hearing at least twenty days prior to the date of the
hearing. The board or its hearing officer may grant continuances upon
good cause shown or upon the request of the private electric supplier.
Timely filing of a request for hearing by a private electric supplier
shall stay any further enforcement under this section until the board
issues an order pursuant to subsection (5) of this section or the request
for hearing is withdrawn.
(5) The board shall issue a written decision within sixty days after
conclusion of the hearing. All costs of the hearing shall be paid by the
private electric supplier if (a) the board determines that the private
electric supplier commenced construction of the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility less than thirty days prior to
submitting the written notice required pursuant to subsection (2) of
section 70-1014.02 or (b) the private electric supplier withdraws its
request for hearing prior to the board issuing its decision.
(6) A private electric supplier which the board finds to be in
violation of the requirements of subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02
shall either (a) pay the fine described in this section and submit a
notice compliant with subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02 or (b)
immediately cease construction or operation of the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility.
Sec. 5. Original section 70-1012.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 70-1001.01, 70-1012, and 70-1015, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-9-